Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.1271

Model school district plan for recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or behavioral distress in students.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction's school safety center, established in RCW 28A.300.630, shall develop a model school district plan for recognition, initial screening, and response to emotional or behavioral distress in students, including but not limited to indicators of possible substance abuse, violence, and youth suicide. The model plan must incorporate research-based best practices, including practices and protocols used in schools and school districts in other states. The model plan must be posted by February 1, 2014, on the school safety center website, along with relevant resources and information to support school districts in developing and implementing the plan required under RCW 28A.320.127.

[ 2019 c 333 s 17; 2013 c 197 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.300.630.

Intent—2019 c 333: See note following RCW 28A.320.124.

Finding—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 43.20A.765.

Findings—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.410.226.

Civil liability—2013 c 197: See RCW 28A.310.501.